Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2913
Physical therapist assistant, defined.

Physical therapist assistant means a person certified as a physical therapist assistant under the Physical Therapy Practice Act.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 131;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,375;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1006.